Illinois, session 104th, HB1066.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Insurance Code is amended by 5adding Section 370b.2 as follows: 6    (215 ILCS 5/370b.2 new)7    Sec. 370b.2. Health care provider nondiscrimination. A 8group health plan or an accident and health insurer offering 9group or individual health insurance coverage shall not 10discriminate with respect to participation under the plan or 11coverage, including reimbursement, against any health care 12provider who is acting within the scope of that provider's 13license or certification under applicable State law. Nothing 14in this Section shall be construed as preventing a group 15health plan, an accident and health insurer, or the Director 16from establishing varying reimbursement rates based on quality 17or performance measures.